Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1140.
do enact as follows:AB1140,11Section 1. 799.01 (1) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:AB1140,2,32799.01 (1) (ag) Extrajudicial evictions. Actions for relief from extrajudicial 3evictions as described in s. 799.47.AB1140,24Section 2. 799.05 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1140,2,125799.05 (3) (b) Except in eviction actions and actions for relief from 6extrajudicial evictions, the return date for a summons served upon a resident of this 7state shall be not less than 8 days nor more than 30 days from the issue date, and 8service shall be made not less than 8 days prior to the return date. In eviction 9actions and actions for relief from extrajudicial evictions, the return date for a 10summons served upon a resident of this state shall be not less than 5 days nor more 11than 25 days from the issue date, and service shall be made not less than 5 days 12prior to the return date.AB1140,313Section 3. 799.05 (7) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1140,2,1714799.05 (7) Form; circuit court commissioner. Except as provided in s. 15799.22 (4) (b) 3., in counties in which a circuit court commissioner is assigned to 16assist in small claims matters, the summons shall be substantially in the following 17form:AB1140,2,1818STATE OF WISCONSIN CIRCUIT COURT: .... COUNTYAB1140,2,1919AB1140,3,11A. B.AB1140,3,22AddressAB1140,3,33City, State Zip Code File No. ....AB1140,3,44 , PlaintiffAB1140,3,55 vs. S U M M O N S (SMALL CLAIMS)AB1140,3,66C.D.AB1140,3,77AddressAB1140,3,88City, State Zip CodeAB1140,3,99 , DefendantAB1140,3,1010AB1140,3,1111THE STATE OF WISCONSIN, to the Defendant:AB1140,3,1212You are being sued for:AB1140,3,1313.... EvictionAB1140,3,1414.... Relief from extrajudicial evictionAB1140,3,1515.... Return of PropertyAB1140,3,1716.... Confirmation, vacation, modification or correction17 of arbitration awardAB1140,3,1818.... $........AB1140,3,2219If you wish to dispute this matter, you must then be in Room ...., of the .... 20(County) County Courthouse, .... (address), .... (city), Wisconsin before .... o’clock 21(a.m.) (p.m.), on ...., .... (year). If you do not appear, a judgment may be given to the 22person suing you for what that person is asking.AB1140,4,21You are encouraged to bring with you all papers and documents relating to 2this matter, but there is no need to bring witnesses at this time.AB1140,4,33Dated at .... County, Wisconsin, this .... day of ...., .... (year)AB1140,4,44 Signed: .... ....AB1140,4,55 E. F., Clerk of Circuit CourtAB1140,4,66 orAB1140,4,77 G. H., Plaintiff’s AttorneyAB1140,4,88 State Bar No.: ....AB1140,4,99 Address: ....AB1140,4,1010 City, State Zip Code: ....AB1140,4,1111 Phone No.: ....AB1140,412Section 4. 799.06 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1140,4,1513799.06 (3) (a) The complaint in an eviction action shall conform to s. 799.41. 14The complaint in other actions under this chapter shall be in writing and shall be 15substantially in the following form:AB1140,4,1616STATE OF WISCONSIN CIRCUIT COURT: .... COUNTYAB1140,4,1717AB1140,4,1818A. B.AB1140,4,1919AddressAB1140,4,2020City, State Zip Code File No. ....AB1140,4,2121 , Plaintiff Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1140 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1140 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1140 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1140 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1140: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting